Hawaii statutes.
[§327-6] Amending or revoking an
anatomical gift before donor's death. (a) Subject to section 327-8, a
donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 327-4
may amend or revoke an anatomical gift by:

(1) A record signed by:

(A) The donor;

(B) The other person; or

(C) Subject to subsection (b), another
individual acting at the direction of the donor or the other person if the
donor or other person is physically unable to sign; or

(2) A later-executed document of gift that amends or
revokes a previous anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift, either
expressly or by inconsistency.

(b) A record signed pursuant to subsection
(a)(1)(C) shall:

(1) Be witnessed by at least two other individuals
who are at least eighteen years of age, one of whom is a disinterested witness,
who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

(2) State that it has been signed and witnessed as
provided in paragraph (1).

(c) Subject to section 327-8, a donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 327-4 may revoke the
gift by the destruction or cancellation of the document of gift, or a portion
of the document of gift used to make the gift, with the intent to revoke the
gift.

(d) A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical
gift that was not made in a will by any form of communication during a terminal
illness or injury addressed to at least two other individuals who are at least
eighteen years of age, one of whom is a disinterested witness.

(e) A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a
will may amend or revoke the gift in the manner provided for amendment or
revocation of wills or as provided in subsection (a). [L 2008, c 122, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next